src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@lahknev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ahknev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lahkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ahkuv MAGUS ;
lahustuv+A:lahustuv MAGUS ;
lahutatav+A:lahutatav MAGUS ;
laidetav+A:laidetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laimav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´aimav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laiuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´aiuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lamav+A:@P.NomStem.First@lamav MAGUS ;
lammutav+A:lammutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@langev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´angev MAGUS ;
laristav+A:laristav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@laskuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´askuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lauldav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´auldav MAGUS ;
laveeriv+A:lav´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lebav+A:@P.NomStem.First@lebav MAGUS ;
leegitsev+A:leegitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@leekiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´eekiv MAGUS ;
leemendav+A:leemendav MAGUS ;
leemetav+A:leemetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lehkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ehkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lehviv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ehviv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@leiduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´eiduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lendav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´endav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@leppiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´eppiv MAGUS ;
levitatav+A:levitatav MAGUS ;
levitav+A:levitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@leviv+A:@P.NomStem.First@leviv MAGUS ;
libisev+A:libisev MAGUS ;
lidutav+A:lidutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lihav+A:@P.NomStem.First@lihav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lihviv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ihviv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@liialdav+A:@P.NomStem.First@liialdav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@liibuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´iibuv MAGUS ;
liidetav+A:liidetav MAGUS ;
liigutav+A:liigutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@liikuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´iikuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@liipav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´iipav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@liituv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´iituv MAGUS ;
lipitsev+A:lipitsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lirtsuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´irtsuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lodev+A:@P.NomStem.First@lodev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@loetav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´oetav MAGUS ;
logisev+A:logisev MAGUS ;
lohisev+A:lohisev MAGUS ;
lohutav+A:lohutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lokkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´okkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@loksuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´oksuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lonkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´onkav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@loodav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´oodav MAGUS ;
loodetav+A:loodetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@loojuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´oojuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@looklev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ooklev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@loov+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´oov MAGUS ;
lotendav+A:lotendav MAGUS ;
lubatav+A:lubatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lubav+A:@P.NomStem.First@lubav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lummav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ummav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@luurav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´uurav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhkev+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õhkev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõhnav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õhnav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõikav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õikav MAGUS ;
lõkendav+A:lõkendav MAGUS ;
lõpetav+A:lõpetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõtv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õT2v%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõõmav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õõmav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõõpiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õõpiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lõõtsuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´õõtsuv MAGUS ;
läbitav+A:läbitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@läbiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@läbiv MAGUS ;
lähenev+A:lähenev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lähtuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ähtuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@läikiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´äikiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lämbuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ämbuv MAGUS ;
lämmatav+A:lämmatav MAGUS ;
läpatav+A:läpatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lärmav+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ärmav MAGUS ;
lömitav+A:lömitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@lööv+A:@P.NomStem.First@l´ööv MAGUS ;
lükatav+A:lükatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@magav+A:@P.NomStem.First@magav MAGUS ;
mahendav+A:mahendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mahtuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´ahtuv MAGUS ;
mahutav+A:mahutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@makstav+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´akstav MAGUS ;
maksustatav+A:maksustatav MAGUS ;
manipuleeritav+A:manipuleeritav MAGUS ;
masendav+A:masendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@meeldiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´eeldiv MAGUS ;
meelitav+A:meelitav MAGUS ;
meelitlev+A:meelitlev MAGUS ;
meenutav+A:meenutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@meenuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´eenuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@minev+A:@P.NomStem.First@minev MAGUS ;
monteeritav+A:monteeritav MAGUS ;
moodustav+A:moodustav MAGUS ;
moodustuv+A:moodustuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mugav+A:@P.NomStem.First@mugav MAGUS ;
mullitav+A:mul,litav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@murduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´urduv MAGUS ;
muretsev+A:muretsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mustav+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´ustav MAGUS ;
muudetav+A:muudetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@muutuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´uutuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mõeldav+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´õeldav MAGUS ;
mõistetav+A:mõistetav MAGUS ;
mõjutav+A:mõjutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mõjuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@mõjuv MAGUS ;
mõnulev+A:mõnulev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mõtlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´õtlev MAGUS ;
mädanev+A:mädanev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mängiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´ängiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mänglev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´änglev MAGUS ;
märatsev+A:märatsev MAGUS ;
märgatav+A:märgatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mäslev+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´äslev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mässav+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´ässav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@määrav+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´äärav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@mööduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´ööduv MAGUS ;
mürisev+A:mürisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@müübiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´üübiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@müüdav+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´üüdav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@müüv+A:@P.NomStem.First@m´üüv MAGUS ;
naeratav+A:naeratav MAGUS ;
nakatav+A:nakatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nakkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´akkav MAGUS ;
naljatlev+A:nal,jatlev MAGUS ;
narmendav+A:narmendav MAGUS ;
nauditav+A:nauditav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nautiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´autiv MAGUS ;
nimetatav+A:nimetatav MAGUS ;
nimetav+A:nimetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@niutsuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´iutsuv MAGUS ;
nohisev+A:nohisev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@noomiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´oomiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@noriv+A:@P.NomStem.First@noriv MAGUS ;
nuheldav+A:nuheldav MAGUS ;
nukrutsev+A:nukrutsev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nõelav+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´õelav MAGUS ;
nõretav+A:nõretav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nõustuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´õustuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nõutav+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´õutav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nägev+A:@P.NomStem.First@nägev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nähtav+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´ähtav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@näitav+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´äitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@näiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´äiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@näriv+A:@P.NomStem.First@näriv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@nöökav+A:@P.NomStem.First@n´öökav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@odav+A:@P.NomStem.First@odav MAGUS ;
ohustav+A:ohustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@oigav+A:@P.NomStem.First@´oigav MAGUS ;
olenev+A:olenev MAGUS ;
oletatav+A:oletatav MAGUS ;
oletav+A:oletav MAGUS ;
omandatav+A:omandatav MAGUS ;
omandav+A:omandav MAGUS ;
omastatav+A:omastatav MAGUS ;
omastav+A:omastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@omav+A:@P.NomStem.First@omav MAGUS ;
oodatav+A:oodatav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ootav+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ootav MAGUS ;
orienteeriv+A:orient´eeriv MAGUS ;
originaalitsev+A:originaalitsev MAGUS ;
osalev+A:osalev MAGUS ;
osastav+A:osastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@osav+A:@P.NomStem.First@osav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@oskav+A:@P.NomStem.First@´oskav MAGUS ;
ostetav+A:ostetav MAGUS ;
osutav+A:osutav MAGUS ;
otsitav+A:ot,sitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@otsiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ot,siv MAGUS ;
otsustav+A:otsustav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@paeluv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´aeluv MAGUS ;
pahandav+A:pahandav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@pahv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ahv TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@paiknev+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´aiknev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@painav+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ainav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@painduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´ainduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@paiskuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@p´aiskuv MAGUS ;
